Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1711
Income, defined.

Income shall mean (1) compensation paid, payable, due, or to be due for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, earnings, income, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and shall include any periodic payments pursuant to a pension or a retirement program and dividends, and (2) any other income from whatever source derived.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 31;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 13.